Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7307
Civil action, authorized; attorney's fees.

An individual that received a gender-altering procedure in violation of section 71-7304 after October 1, 2023, and while such individual was younger than nineteen years of age, or the parent or guardian of such an individual, may bring a civil action for appropriate relief against the health care practitioner who performed the gender-altering procedure. Appropriate relief in an action under this section includes actual damages and reasonable attorney's fees. An action under this section shall be brought within two years after discovery of damages.

Laws 2023, LB574, § 20.